Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-103
Public land; confirmation; record; fee.

It shall be the duty of the several county clerks to whom any such copy shall be presented to record it in the books in which land patents are or may be recorded, and in the order in which such copy may be received. The clerks shall be entitled to the same fees for recording such copies as are allowed by law for recording deeds, which fees shall be paid them out of the General Fund upon the warrant of the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1872, § 3, p. 7;

R.S.1913, § 5840;

C.S.1922, § 5176;

C.S.1929, § 72-103;

R.S.1943, § 72-103.